Utah statutes.
53A-15-1102.   Uniforms in schools -- Legislative finding -- Policies.
(1)  The Legislature finds that:
(a)  each student should be allowed to learn in a safe environment which
fosters the learning process and is free from unnecessary disruptions;
(b)  the wearing of certain types of clothing may identify students as members
of youth gangs and contribute to disruptive behavior and violence in the
schools;
(c)  school uniform policies may be part of an overall program to:
(i)  improve school safety and discipline; and
(ii)  help avoid the disruption of the classroom atmosphere and decorum and
prevent disturbances among students; and
(d)  school uniforms may:
(i)  decrease violence and theft among students; and
(ii)  foster and promote desirable school operating conditions and a positive
educational environment in accordance with this part.
(2)  In accordance with Section 53A-15-1103, a school may adopt a school
uniform policy that requires students enrolled at that school to wear a
designated school uniform during the school day.
(3)  A school uniform policy shall:
(a)  protect students' free exercise of religious beliefs;
(b)  specify whether the uniform policy is voluntary or mandatory for
students;
(c)  specify whether or not the uniform policy has an opt-out provision in
addition to the provisions under Subsection (5); and
(d)  include a provision for financial assistance to families who cannot
afford to purchase a required uniform, which may include:
(i)  the school providing school uniforms to students;
(ii)  the school making used school uniforms available to students; or
(iii)  other programs to make school uniforms available to economically
disadvantaged students.
(4)  A school uniform policy under this part is not considered a fee for
either an elementary or a secondary school.
(5)  A school uniform policy shall include a provision allowing a principal at
any time during the school year to grant an exemption from wearing a school
uniform to a student because of extenuating circumstances.
(6) (a)  If a school adopts a school uniform policy under this part, that
school's governing body or local school board shall adopt local appellate
procedures for school actions under this part, including a denial of an
exemption requested under Subsection (5).
(b)  A person may seek judicial review of an action under this part only after
exhausting the remedies provided under this Subsection (6).
